src/nouns.twolc
Alphabet a b c d e E:e f g h i k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z %-:0 ;

Sets
    V = a e i o u ;
    C = b c d f g h k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;

Definitions
    Cons = [ C | q u ] ;
    !! Roots that keep the -er in oblique cases.
    !KeepRoot = [ p u |           ! puer
    !             g e n |         ! gener
    !             s o c |         ! socer
    !             l i b |         ! liberi
    !             v e s p |       ! vesper
    !             s i g n i f ] ; ! signifer

Rules
"-er to -r contraction"
!e:0 <=> .#. ~KeepRoot _ r %-: ;
E:0 <=> _ r %-: ;
